Washington statutes.
RCW 32.34.025

Conversion of stock savings bank to savings bank without capital stock.

(1) The conversion of a stock savings bank to a savings bank without capital stock requires the affirmative vote or written consent of two-thirds of the directors of the savings bank and requires the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the outstanding stock of the savings bank. The conversion shall proceed as prescribed in chapter 32.32 RCW subject to the authority of the director under RCW 32.32.010 and is complete upon the payment into the guaranty fund of the resulting savings bank without capital stock of any surplus remaining after satisfaction of all debts and liabilities of the savings bank, including but not limited to liabilities to dissenting shareholders under RCW 32.34.060.

(2) Any stock savings bank may provide in its articles of incorporation for a higher percentage of affirmative shareholder votes to approve a conversion to a savings bank without capital stock.

[ 1999 c 14 s 34.]